Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Weights and Measures Standards

§ 2651.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases have the following meanings:

“Commodity in package form” means commodity put up or packaged in any manner in advance of sale in units suitable for either wholesale or retail sale, exclusive, however, of an auxiliary shipping container enclosing packages that individually conform to the requirements of this chapter. An individual item or lot of any commodity not in package form as defined in this section, but on which there is marked a selling price based on an established price per unit of weight or of measure, shall be commodity in package form.

“Commercial weighing and measuring device” shall be construed to include any weight or measure or weighing or measuring device commercially used or employed in establishing the size, quantity, extent, area, or measurement of quantities, things, produce, or articles for distribution or consumption, purchased, offered, or submitted for sale, hire, or award, or in computing any basic charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of weight or measure, and shall also include any accessory attached to or used in connection with a commercial weighing or measuring device when that accessory is so designed or installed that its operation affects, or may affect, the accuracy of the device. “Commercial weighing and measuring device” shall not include:

a device within a plant or business used internally to determine the weight, measure, or count of any commodity or thing while manufacturing, processing, or preparing the commodity or thing for market;

a pharmacy device used for determining the appropriate dosage of any medication or medical treatment; or

U.S. Postal Service scales.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets or his or her designee.

“Dealer in weighing or measuring devices” means any person or employee thereof who sells, buys, exchanges, or trades commercial weighing or measuring devices in the State.

Definitions of special units of measure. The term “barrel,” when used in connection with fermented liquor, means a unit of 31 gallons. The term “ton” means a unit of 2,000 pounds avoirdupois weight. The term “cord” means the amount of wood that is contained in a space of 128 cubic feet and a run of wood is 42 2/3 cubic feet when the wood is ranked and well stowed.

“Inspector” means a State inspector of weights and measures.

“Intrastate commerce” means commerce or trade that is begun, carried on, and completed wholly within the limits of the State of Vermont, and the phrase “introduced into intrastate commerce” shall be construed to define the time and place at which the first sale and delivery being made either directly to the purchaser or to a common carrier for shipment to the purchaser.

“Licensed public weighmaster” means a natural person licensed under this chapter.

“Maple syrup; legal weight and measure” means the legal weight of a gallon of maple syrup shall not be less than 11.07 pounds and the legal measure thereof shall be 231 cubic inches (128 fluid ounces) at 68 degrees F. Whenever maple syrup is sold by the gallon, quart, pint, or gill, or multiple fraction thereof, it must be sold according to that legal weight and measure.

“Person” means both the plural and singular, as the case demands and includes individuals, partnerships, corporations, companies, societies, and associations.

“Service person of weighing and measuring devices” means any person or employee thereof who installs, services, repairs, or reconditions commercial weighing or measuring devices in the State.

“Sell” and “sale” means barter and exchange.

“Standard bushel for apples” means a container having a capacity of not less than one U.S. standard bushel or 2150.42 cubic inches.

“Weights and measures” means all weights and measures of every kind, instruments and devices for weighing and measuring, and any appliances and accessories associated with any or all such instruments and devices including electric vehicle supply equipment available to the public, as defined in subdivision 2730(a)(14) of this title, but not including meters for the measurement of electricity, gas (natural or manufactured), or water when they are operated in a public utility system. Such electricity, gas, and water meters are specifically excluded from the purview of this chapter, and this chapter shall not apply to such meters or to any appliances or accessories associated therewith.

“Vehicle” means any device in, upon, or by which any property, produce, commodity, or article is or may be transported or drawn.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 2, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1971, No. 69

, § 2, eff. April 15, 1971;

1981, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.);

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2, 7;

2019, No. 59

, § 31;

2021, No. 47

, § 5.

§ 2652.
Systems of weights and measures.

The system of weights and measures in customary use in the United States and the metric system of weights and measures are jointly recognized, and either one or both of these systems shall be used for all commercial purposes in the State of Vermont. The definitions of basic units of weight and measure, the tables of weight and measure, and weights and measures equivalents, as published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, are recognized and shall govern weighing and measuring equipment and transactions in the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 3, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1971, No. 69

, § 3, eff. April 15, 1971;

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2653.
State standards of weight and measure.

Such weights and measures in conformity with the standards of the United States as have been supplied to the State by the federal government or otherwise obtained by the State for use as State standards shall, when they have been certified as being satisfactory for use as such by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, be the State standards of weight and measure. The State standards shall be kept in a safe and suitable place. They shall not be removed from the laboratory except for repairs or for calibration, or as otherwise necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 4, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1971, No. 69

, § 4, eff. April 15, 1971;

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 2654.
Field standards and equipment.

In addition to the State standards provided for in section 2653 of this title, there shall be supplied by the State such “field standards” and such equipment as may be found necessary to carry out the provisions of this title. The field standards shall be verified upon their initial receipt and, thereafter, as often as deemed necessary by the Secretary by comparison with the State standards.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 5, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1971, No. 69

, § 5, eff. April 15, 1971;

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2655.
Construction of contracts.

Fractional parts of any unit of weight or measure shall mean like fractional parts of the value of such unit as prescribed or defined in sections 2651 and 2652 of this title, and all contracts concerning the sale of commodities and services shall be construed in accordance with this requirement.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 36, eff. April 14, 1967.